Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 8

Minimum Fire and Police Retirement Allowances

6-54-801. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the fire department or police department of any municipality that pays wages to its employees for services rendered;

“Employee” means any person who, on the adoption of this part, is a paid employee in the fire department or police department of any municipality and a member of a municipal retirement system or pension plan;

“Municipality” means any municipality having its own employees retirement system or pension plan;

“Retired employee” means any person who has been a paid employee in the fire department or police department of any municipality and who, on the adoption of this part, is receiving from such municipality a retirement allowance based upon such person's service in such department;

“Retirement allowance” means the monthly payment for life made to a retired employee or the retired employee's survivors or beneficiaries under a municipal employees retirement system or pension plan;

“Retirement system” or “pension plan” means an existing system or plan by which a municipality is paying or will pay the retired employees of its fire department or police department a retirement allowance after such employees have complied with certain conditions or requirements of employment or service to the municipality; and

“Survivor or beneficiary” includes any person, who is receiving, or who is entitled to receive, an allowance or survivor benefit from a retirement system that is based upon the retirement allowance of an employee or a retired employee.

Acts 1971, ch. 397, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-658.

Cross-References. Review of local government retirement plans, title 3, ch. 9, part 2.

6-54-802. Adoption of part — Application of part.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governing body of any municipality may by ordinance adopt this part to establish and to authorize the payment of the minimum retirement allowance provided in § 6-54-803. The adoption of this part shall not authorize a decrease in the retirement allowance presently being paid to any retired employee. The adoption of this part by a municipality shall be permanent and such action may not be repealed to the detriment of any retired employee or such retired employee's survivor or beneficiary.

If the department of any municipality has more than one (1) retirement system or pension plan for its retired employees, the adoption of this part by the governing body of the municipality shall not affect any provisions of such retirement system or pension plan, except as is necessary to provide the minimum retirement allowance established in subsection (a).

This part shall not apply to retirement allowances of municipal employees under the Tennessee state retirement system.

This part shall not apply to any retirement system, pension plan or division thereof in which the member's or beneficiary's benefits are computed in conjunction with or reduced by social security benefits.

Acts 1971, ch. 397, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-659.

6-54-803. Computation of allowances — Cost of living benefits.

The minimum retirement allowance for an employee, during the remainder of such employee's life, shall be computed as follows:

The retirement allowance of such employee who retires upon reaching the minimum age of fifty (50) years or older after a total of not less than twenty-five (25) separate years of service in either or both departments shall be two percent (2%) multiplied by the number of years of service, up to a maximum of thirty (30) years of service, multiplied by such employee's highest monthly salary during such employee's period of service in the department.

Such allowance shall not be less than fifty percent (50%) or greater than sixty percent (60%) of such employee's highest monthly salary during such employee's period of service in the department.

In addition to the retirement allowance, a retired employee shall be paid a cost of living benefit each month beginning January 1 of the year following the twenty-fourth month of such employee's retirement. Such benefit shall be adjusted annually thereafter and shall be computed by multiplying the retirement allowance by the percentage of increase or decrease in the consumer price index, as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics in the United States department of labor, for the twelve-month period ending September 30 of each year. Such percentage shall not exceed three percent (3%) in any year. The retirement allowance shall not be decreased below the amount provided in subsection (a). Such percentage shall be applied only to the retirement allowance and shall not be compounded from year to year.

The retirement allowance of the survivor or beneficiary of any employee or retired employee shall be computed by using the allowances in subsection (a). The cost of living benefit shall be computed in the same manner as provided in subsection (b).

Acts 1971, ch. 397, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-660.